Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 6. Reimbursement for Costs of Port and Harbor Bonds.

Sec. 29.60.700.
Reimbursement for costs of municipal capital projects.

Subject to appropriations for the purpose, during each fiscal year, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall allocate to each municipality an amount to reimburse the costs paid by the municipality during the immediately preceding fiscal year for the principal and interest on outstanding debt for projects listed in (b) of this section. An allocation may be made to a municipality only if

the debt was incurred by the municipality before July 1, 2007, or, if the debt is for a small boat harbor, before July 1, 2012; and

the project or facility financed with the debt proceeds is located in the municipality and the project or facility is operated or controlled by the municipality.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may make an allocation to a municipality under (a) of this section only for reimbursement of costs incurred for the following construction and renovation projects and only for reimbursement of total project costs incurred up to the following amounts:

PROJECT Valdez $ 3,013,500 Nome 1,000,000 Anchorage (Port of Anchorage expansion) 15,000,000 Matanuska-Susitna Borough (deep water port
and road upgrade) 10,000,000 Unalaska (LSA small boat harbor) 5,000,000 Aleutians East Borough/Akutan
(small boat harbor) 4,000,000 Lake and Peninsula Borough/Chignik (dock project) 1,000,000 Aleutians East Borough/False Pass (small boat harbor) 2,000,000 Fairbanks North Star Borough (Eielson AFB schools,
major maintenance and upgrades) 4,500,000 City of Fairbanks (fire headquarters station
replacement) 7,500,000 Saxman (public safety building) 1,500,000

Click to view

History.

(§ 8 ch 130 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 115 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2007)